fi/fi_FI.aff
FLAG num
SFX 10137 N 1
SFX 10137 pä ässä .
SFX 10138 N 1
SFX 10138 0 d .
SFX 10139 N 1
SFX 10139 alue -alueelta .
SFX 10140 N 1
SFX 10140 alue -alueita .
SFX 10141 N 1
SFX 10141 alue -aluetta .
SFX 10142 N 1
SFX 10142 ät öihin .
SFX 10143 N 1
SFX 10143 ala -ala .
SFX 10144 N 1
SFX 10144 ala -alaa .
SFX 10145 N 1
SFX 10145 ala -alalle .
SFX 10146 N 1
SFX 10146 firma -firma .
SFX 10147 N 1
SFX 10147 firma -firman .
SFX 10148 N 1
SFX 10148 palvelu -palvelu .
SFX 10149 N 1
SFX 10149 palvelu -palveluita .
SFX 10150 N 1
SFX 10150 yritys -yrityksiä .
SFX 10151 N 1
SFX 10151 yritys -yritystä .
SFX 10152 N 1
SFX 10152 ata taa .
SFX 10153 N 1
SFX 10153 ata taamaan .
SFX 10154 N 1
SFX 10154 ata taamalla .
SFX 10155 N 1
SFX 10155 ata taamassa .
SFX 10156 N 1
SFX 10156 ata taan .
SFX 10157 N 1
SFX 10157 ata taat .
SFX 10158 N 1
SFX 10158 ata taavat .
SFX 10159 N 1
SFX 10159 ata tasi .
SFX 10160 N 1
SFX 10160 ata tasin .
SFX 10161 N 1
SFX 10161 ti issäkin .
SFX 10162 N 1
SFX 10162 pilvi -pilvien .
SFX 10163 N 1
SFX 10163 ala -alaan .
SFX 10164 Y 1
SFX 10164 0 iden .
PFX 10164 Y 1
PFX 10164 cleantech cleantech- .
SFX 10165 Y 1
SFX 10165 ta nan .
PFX 10165 Y 1
PFX 10165 cleantech cleantech- .
PFX 10166 N 1
PFX 10166 cleantech cleantech- .
SFX 10167 Y 1
SFX 10167 0 a .
PFX 10167 Y 1
PFX 10167 cleantech cleantech- .
SFX 10168 N 1
SFX 10168 markkinat -markkinat .
SFX 10169 N 1
SFX 10169 osaaminen -osaaminen .
SFX 10170 N 1
SFX 10170 osaaminen -osaamisen .
SFX 10171 N 1
SFX 10171 osaaminen -osaamista .
SFX 10172 N 1
SFX 10172 ratkaisu -ratkaisuja .
SFX 10173 N 1
SFX 10173 ratkaisu -ratkaisujen .
SFX 10174 N 1
SFX 10174 ratkaisut -ratkaisut .
SFX 10175 N 1
SFX 10175 sektori -sektorilla .
SFX 10176 N 1
SFX 10176 sektori -sektorin .
SFX 10177 N 1
SFX 10177 strategia -strategian .
SFX 10178 N 1
SFX 10178 teollisuus -teollisuuden .
SFX 10179 N 1
SFX 10179 yritys -yrityksiin .
SFX 10180 N 1
SFX 10180 yritys -yrityksille .
SFX 10181 N 1
SFX 10181 yritys -yrityksillä .
PFX 10182 N 1
PFX 10182 clearing clearing- .
SFX 10183 N 1
SFX 10183 asu -asu .
SFX 10184 N 1
SFX 10184 baari -baareja .
SFX 10185 N 1
SFX 10185 baari -baariin .
SFX 10186 N 1
SFX 10186 baari -baarin .
SFX 10187 N 1
SFX 10187 juhla -juhlat .
SFX 10188 N 1
SFX 10188 kirsikka -kirsikoita .
SFX 10189 N 1
SFX 10189 kutsu -kutsuilla .
SFX 10190 N 1
SFX 10190 kutsu -kutsuille .
SFX 10191 N 1
SFX 10191 kutsu -kutsuja .
SFX 10192 N 1
SFX 10192 kutsu -kutsujen .
SFX 10193 N 1
SFX 10193 kutsu -kutsut .
SFX 10194 N 1
SFX 10194 lasi -lasi .
SFX 10195 N 1
SFX 10195 lasi -lasiin .
SFX 10196 N 1
SFX 10196 lihapulla -lihapullia .
SFX 10197 N 1
SFX 10197 mekko -mekko .
SFX 10198 N 1
SFX 10198 pala -palat .
SFX 10199 N 1
SFX 10199 palo -paloista .
SFX 10200 N 1
SFX 10200 palo -paloja .
SFX 10201 N 1
SFX 10201 palo -palojen .
SFX 10202 N 1
SFX 10202 piirakka -piirakoita .
SFX 10203 N 1
SFX 10203 tikku -tikku .
SFX 10204 N 1
SFX 10204 tikku -tikkua .
SFX 10205 N 1
SFX 10205 tikku -tikkuihin .
SFX 10206 N 1
SFX 10206 tikku -tikkuja .
SFX 10207 N 1
SFX 10207 tikku -tikkujen .
SFX 10208 N 1
SFX 10208 tikku -tikuilla .
SFX 10209 N 1
SFX 10209 tikku -tikulla .
SFX 10210 N 1
SFX 10210 tikku -tikun .
SFX 10211 N 1
SFX 10211 tikku -tikut .
SFX 10212 N 1
SFX 10212 tilaisuus -tilaisuudella .
SFX 10213 N 1
SFX 10213 tilaisuus -tilaisuudessa .
SFX 10214 N 1
SFX 10214 tilaisuus -tilaisuudet .
SFX 10215 N 1
SFX 10215 tilaisuus -tilaisuuksia .
SFX 10216 N 1
SFX 10216 tilaisuus -tilaisuuksien .
SFX 10217 N 1
SFX 10217 tilaisuus -tilaisuuksiin .
SFX 10218 N 1
SFX 10218 tilaisuus -tilaisuuksissa .
PFX 10219 N 1
PFX 10219 cocktail cocktail- .
SFX 10220 N 1
SFX 10220 tilaisuus -tilaisuuteen .
SFX 10221 N 1
SFX 10221 asu -asuja .
SFX 10222 N 1
SFX 10222 housut -housuihin .
SFX 10223 N 1
SFX 10223 housut -housuissa .
SFX 10224 N 1
SFX 10224 housut -housuista .
SFX 10225 N 1
SFX 10225 housut -housuja .
SFX 10226 N 1
SFX 10226 housut -housujen .
PFX 10227 N 1
PFX 10227 college college- .
SFX 10228 N 1
SFX 10228 kangas -kangasta .
SFX 10229 Y 1
SFX 10229 0 a .
PFX 10229 Y 1
PFX 10229 college college- .
SFX 10230 N 1
SFX 10230 paita -paitoja .
SFX 10231 N 1
SFX 10231 puku -puku .
SFX 10232 N 1
SFX 10232 puku -puvun .
SFX 10233 N 1
SFX 10233 pusero -pusero .
SFX 10234 N 1
SFX 10234 pusero -puseron .
SFX 10235 N 1
SFX 10235 back -back .
SFX 10236 N 1
SFX 10236 back -backia .
SFX 10237 N 1
SFX 10237 back -backin .
SFX 10238 N 1
SFX 10238 albumi -albumi .
SFX 10239 N 1
SFX 10239 albumi -albumin .
SFX 10240 N 1
SFX 10240 albumi -albuminsa .
SFX 10241 N 1
SFX 10241 levy -levy .
SFX 10242 N 1
SFX 10242 merkintä -merkinnän .
SFX 10243 N 1
SFX 10243 merkintä -merkinnät .
SFX 10244 N 1
SFX 10244 merkintä -merkintä .
SFX 10245 N 1
SFX 10245 merkintä -merkintää .
SFX 10246 N 1
SFX 10246 merkintä -merkintöjä .
SFX 10247 N 1
SFX 10247 bootsi -bootsit .
SFX 10248 N 1
SFX 10248 hattu -hatun .
SFX 10249 N 1
SFX 10249 hattu -hatut .
SFX 10250 N 1
SFX 10250 sali -salia .
SFX 10251 N 1
SFX 10251 sali -salille .
SFX 10252 N 1
SFX 10252 treeni -treeneihin .
SFX 10253 N 1
SFX 10253 treeni -treeneissä .
SFX 10254 N 1
SFX 10254 treeni -treenejä .
SFX 10255 N 1
SFX 10255 treeni -treeni .
SFX 10256 N 1
SFX 10256 treeni -treenien .
SFX 10257 N 1
SFX 10257 treeni -treenin .
SFX 10258 N 1
SFX 10258 treeni -treenit .
SFX 10259 N 1
SFX 10259 tyylinen -tyylinen .
PFX 10260 N 1
PFX 10260 crossfit crossfit- .
SFX 10261 Y 1
SFX 10261 i eissa .
PFX 10261 Y 1
PFX 10261 cup cup- .
PFX 10262 N 1
PFX 10262 cup cup- .
SFX 10263 Y 1
SFX 10263 0 a .
PFX 10263 Y 1
PFX 10263 cup cup- .
SFX 10264 Y 1
SFX 10264 0 in .
PFX 10264 Y 1
PFX 10264 cup cup- .
SFX 10265 Y 1
SFX 10265 0 n .
PFX 10265 Y 1
PFX 10265 cup cup- .
SFX 10266 Y 1
SFX 10266 0 ssa .
PFX 10266 Y 1
PFX 10266 cup cup- .
SFX 10267 Y 1
SFX 10267 0 sta .
PFX 10267 Y 1
PFX 10267 cup cup- .
SFX 10268 Y 1
SFX 10268 0 llä .
PFX 10268 Y 1
PFX 10268 cup cup- .
SFX 10269 Y 1
SFX 10269 s ksella .
PFX 10269 Y 1
PFX 10269 cup cup- .
SFX 10270 Y 1
SFX 10270 0 issa .
PFX 10270 Y 1
PFX 10270 cup cup- .
SFX 10271 Y 1
SFX 10271 0 ja .
PFX 10271 Y 1
PFX 10271 cup cup- .
SFX 10272 Y 1
SFX 10272 0 jen .
PFX 10272 Y 1
PFX 10272 cup cup- .
SFX 10273 Y 1
SFX 10273 0 t .
PFX 10273 Y 1
PFX 10273 cup cup- .
SFX 10274 N 1
SFX 10274 kisa -kisoissa .
SFX 10275 Y 1
SFX 10275 s den .
PFX 10275 Y 1
PFX 10275 cup cup- .
SFX 10276 Y 1
SFX 10276 s det .
PFX 10276 Y 1
PFX 10276 cup cup- .
SFX 10277 Y 1
SFX 10277 s teen .
PFX 10277 Y 1
PFX 10277 cup cup- .
SFX 10278 Y 1
SFX 10278 s tta .
PFX 10278 Y 1
PFX 10278 cup cup- .
SFX 10279 N 1
SFX 10279 mitta -mitat .
SFX 10280 N 1
SFX 10280 muoto -muodossa .
SFX 10281 Y 1
SFX 10281 nen sen .
PFX 10281 Y 1
PFX 10281 cup cup- .
SFX 10282 Y 1
SFX 10282 nen sena .
PFX 10282 Y 1
PFX 10282 cup cup- .
SFX 10283 Y 1
SFX 10283 nen sessa .
PFX 10283 Y 1
PFX 10283 cup cup- .
SFX 10284 Y 1
SFX 10284 0 ita .
PFX 10284 Y 1
PFX 10284 cup cup- .
SFX 10285 Y 1
SFX 10285 0 un .
PFX 10285 Y 1
PFX 10285 cup cup- .
SFX 10286 Y 1
SFX 10286 0 ssä .
PFX 10286 Y 1
PFX 10286 cup cup- .
SFX 10287 Y 1
SFX 10287 0 et .
PFX 10287 Y 1
PFX 10287 cup cup- .
SFX 10288 Y 1
SFX 10288 0 issä .
PFX 10288 Y 1
PFX 10288 cup cup- .
SFX 10289 Y 1
SFX 10289 0 istä .
PFX 10289 Y 1
PFX 10289 cup cup- .
SFX 10290 Y 1
SFX 10290 0 itä .
PFX 10290 Y 1
PFX 10290 cup cup- .
SFX 10291 Y 1
SFX 10291 0 ttä .
PFX 10291 Y 1
PFX 10291 cup cup- .
SFX 10292 Y 1
SFX 10292 0 eseen .
PFX 10292 Y 1
PFX 10292 cup cup- .
SFX 10293 Y 1
SFX 10293 a ien .
PFX 10293 Y 1
PFX 10293 cup cup- .
SFX 10294 Y 1
SFX 10294 to on .
PFX 10294 Y 1
PFX 10294 cup cup- .
SFX 10295 Y 1
SFX 10295 to osta .
PFX 10295 Y 1
PFX 10295 cup cup- .
SFX 10296 Y 1
SFX 10296 0 on .
PFX 10296 Y 1
PFX 10296 cup cup- .
SFX 10297 N 1
SFX 10297 halli -halli .
SFX 10298 N 1
SFX 10298 rata -rataa .
PFX 10299 N 1
PFX 10299 curling curling- .
SFX 10300 Y 1
SFX 10300 s tta .
PFX 10300 Y 1
PFX 10300 curling curling- .
SFX 10301 Y 1
SFX 10301 0 a .
PFX 10301 Y 1
PFX 10301 curling curling- .
SFX 10302 Y 1
SFX 10302 0 en .
PFX 10302 Y 1
PFX 10302 curling curling- .
SFX 10303 Y 1
SFX 10303 a nut .
PFX 10303 Y 1
PFX 10303 deadline deadline- .
SFX 10304 N 1
SFX 10304 puoli -puolelle .
SFX 10305 N 1
SFX 10305 da nee .
SFX 10306 N 1
SFX 10306 da neella .
SFX 10307 N 1
SFX 10307 ti illäkin .
SFX 10308 N 1
SFX 10308 ti illään .
SFX 10309 N 1
SFX 10309 ti istään .
SFX 10310 N 1
SFX 10310 nen sensä .
SFX 10311 N 1
SFX 10311 re teessä .
SFX 10312 N 1
SFX 10312 re teestä .
SFX 10313 N 1
SFX 10313 poikanen npoikanen .
SFX 10314 N 1
SFX 10314 poikanen npoikasen .
SFX 10315 N 1
SFX 10315 i eittenkin .
SFX 10316 N 1
SFX 10316 n elta .
SFX 10317 N 1
SFX 10317 nen tu .
SFX 10318 N 1
SFX 10318 nen simmassa .
PFX 10319 N 1
PFX 10319 demokraattis demokraattis- .
SFX 10320 N 1
SFX 10320 republikaaninen -republikaanisen .
SFX 10321 N 1
SFX 10321 ni t .
SFX 10322 N 1
SFX 10322 look -look .
PFX 10323 N 1
PFX 10323 design design- .
SFX 10324 Y 1
SFX 10324 0 a .
PFX 10324 Y 1
PFX 10324 design design- .
SFX 10325 Y 1
SFX 10325 0 n .
PFX 10325 Y 1
PFX 10325 design design- .
SFX 10326 N 1
SFX 10326 brändi -brändi .
SFX 10327 Y 1
SFX 10327 ti it .
PFX 10327 Y 1
PFX 10327 design design- .
SFX 10328 Y 1
SFX 10328 i ejä .
PFX 10328 Y 1
PFX 10328 design design- .
SFX 10329 N 1
SFX 10329 huume -huumeet .
SFX 10330 Y 1
SFX 10330 e teet .
PFX 10330 Y 1
PFX 10330 designer designer- .
SFX 10331 N 1
SFX 10331 laukku -laukkuja .
SFX 10332 N 1
SFX 10332 vaate -vaatteita .
SFX 10333 N 1
SFX 10333 esine -esineet .
SFX 10334 N 1
SFX 10334 esine -esineiden .
SFX 10335 N 1
SFX 10335 esine -esineistä .
SFX 10336 N 1
SFX 10336 esine -esineitä .
SFX 10337 N 1
SFX 10337 esine -esinettä .
SFX 10338 N 1
SFX 10338 hankinta -hankinnoin .
SFX 10339 Y 1
SFX 10339 0 ssa .
PFX 10339 Y 1
PFX 10339 design design- .
SFX 10340 N 1
SFX 10340 huone -huoneissa .
SFX 10341 N 1
SFX 10341 huone -huoneita .
SFX 10342 Y 1
SFX 10342 0 illa .
PFX 10342 Y 1
PFX 10342 design design- .
SFX 10343 Y 1
SFX 10343 0 ja .
PFX 10343 Y 1
PFX 10343 design design- .
SFX 10344 Y 1
SFX 10344 0 jen .
PFX 10344 Y 1
PFX 10344 design design- .
SFX 10345 Y 1
SFX 10345 0 t .
PFX 10345 Y 1
PFX 10345 design design- .
SFX 10346 N 1
SFX 10346 huume -huume .
SFX 10347 N 1
SFX 10347 huume -huumeiden .
SFX 10348 N 1
SFX 10348 huume -huumeita .
SFX 10349 N 1
SFX 10349 huume -huumetta .
SFX 10350 Y 1
SFX 10350 0 et .
PFX 10350 Y 1
PFX 10350 design design- .
SFX 10351 Y 1
SFX 10351 0 ita .
PFX 10351 Y 1
PFX 10351 design design- .
SFX 10352 N 1
SFX 10352 kaupat -kauppoja .
SFX 10353 Y 1
SFX 10353 ko ot .
PFX 10353 Y 1
PFX 10353 design design- .
SFX 10354 N 1
SFX 10354 koru -koruja .
SFX 10355 N 1
SFX 10355 lasi -lasia .
SFX 10356 N 1
SFX 10356 liike -liikkeet .
SFX 10357 N 1
SFX 10357 liike -liikkeistä .
SFX 10358 N 1
SFX 10358 liike -liikkeitä .
SFX 10359 N 1
SFX 10359 luomus -luomuksia .
SFX 10360 N 1
SFX 10360 merkki -merkkejä .
SFX 10361 N 1
SFX 10361 merkki -merkkien .
SFX 10362 N 1
SFX 10362 ostos -ostoksia .
SFX 10363 Y 1
SFX 10363 a oja .
PFX 10363 Y 1
PFX 10363 design design- .
SFX 10364 Y 1
SFX 10364 i eja .
PFX 10364 Y 1
PFX 10364 design design- .
SFX 10365 Y 1
SFX 10365 ki giksi .
PFX 10365 Y 1
PFX 10365 design design- .
SFX 10366 Y 1
SFX 10366 si den .
PFX 10366 Y 1
PFX 10366 design design- .
SFX 10367 N 1
SFX 10367 studio -studio .
SFX 10368 N 1
SFX 10368 tavara -tavaraa .
SFX 10369 N 1
SFX 10369 tiimi -tiimistä .
SFX 10370 N 1
SFX 10370 tuoli -tuoleja .
SFX 10371 N 1
SFX 10371 tuoli -tuoli .
SFX 10372 N 1
SFX 10372 tuoli -tuolit .
SFX 10373 N 1
SFX 10373 tuote -tuote .
SFX 10374 N 1
SFX 10374 tuote -tuotteeksi .
SFX 10375 N 1
SFX 10375 tuote -tuotteen .
SFX 10376 N 1
SFX 10376 tuote -tuotteiden .
SFX 10377 N 1
SFX 10377 tuote -tuotteisiin .
SFX 10378 N 1
SFX 10378 tuote -tuotteista .
SFX 10379 Y 1
SFX 10379 s ksen .
PFX 10379 Y 1
PFX 10379 design design- .
SFX 10380 Y 1
SFX 10380 0 ta .
PFX 10380 Y 1
PFX 10380 design design- .
SFX 10381 N 1
SFX 10381 tyylinen -tyylisen .
SFX 10382 N 1
SFX 10382 vaate -vaatteisiin .
SFX 10383 Y 1
SFX 10383 n men .
